test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k8x_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: mógvur
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: mógv
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: mógvi
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: mós
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: mógvurin
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: mógvin
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: mónum
    mógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: mósins
